Utah statutes.
57-21-8.   Jurisdiction -- Department -- Division.
(1)  The commission has jurisdiction over the subject of housing
discrimination under this chapter and may delegate the responsibility of
receiving, processing, and investigating allegations of discriminatory housing
practices and enforcing this chapter to the division.
(2)  The commission may:
(a)  adopt rules necessary to administer this chapter in accordance with Title
63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act;
(b)  appoint and prescribe the duties of investigators, legal counsel, and
other employees and agents that it considers necessary for the enforcement of
this chapter; and
(c)  issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or the production
of evidence for use in any investigation, conference, or hearing conducted by
the division, and if a person fails to comply with such a subpoena, petition a
court of competent jurisdiction for an order to show cause why that person
should not be held in contempt.
(3)  The division:
(a)  may receive, reject, investigate, and determine complaints alleging
discriminatory housing practices prohibited by this chapter;
(b)  shall attempt conciliation between the parties through informal efforts,
conference, persuasion, or other reasonable methods for the purposes of
resolving the complaint;
(c)  may seek prompt judicial action for appropriate temporary or preliminary
relief pending final disposition of a complaint if the division and the
commission conclude that such an action is necessary to carry out the purposes
of this chapter;
(d)  may, with the commission, initiate a civil action in a court of competent
jurisdiction to:
(i)  enforce the rights granted or protected under this chapter;
(ii)  seek injunctive or other equitable relief, including temporary
restraining orders, preliminary injunctions, or permanent injunctions;
(iii)  seek damages; and
(iv)  enforce final commission orders on the division's own behalf or on
behalf of another person in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter;
(e)  may initiate formal agency action under Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act; and
(f)  may promote public awareness of the rights and remedies under this
chapter by implementing programs to increase the awareness of landlords, real
estate agents, and other citizens of their rights and responsibilities under
the Utah Fair Housing Act, but may not solicit fair housing complaints or
cases.
